Utah statutes.
73-5a-503.   Owners required to perform maintenance -- Orders to protect
life and property.
(1)  Following an inspection, the state engineer shall specify what
maintenance is necessary to keep the dam and appurtenant structures in
satisfactory condition, and the owner of the dam shall be responsible for that
maintenance.
(2)  Depending upon the severity of problems noted during an inspection, the
state engineer may issue orders for:
(a)  engineering studies;
(b)  repairs;
(c)  storage limitations;
(d)  removal of the dam;
(e)  breaching of the dam; or
(f)  any other remedy the state engineer determines is appropriate to protect
life and property.
